Georgia statutes. TITLE 22 Eminent Domain
Article 4A Natural or Artificial Gas

22-3-95.
Eminent domain use by natural gas transporters or distributors.

The power of eminent domain may be exercised by persons who are or may be engaged in constructing or operating pipelines for the transportation or distribution of natural or artificial gas and by persons who are or may be engaged in furnishing natural or artificial gas for heating, lighting, or power purposes in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-3-95

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 744, § 2/HB 1036.